Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-885.19
License; form; broker's branch office; license; fee.

(1) The commission shall prescribe the forms of brokers' and salespersons' licenses.

(2) If a broker maintains more than one place of business within the state, he or she shall obtain a branch office license for each branch office so maintained by him or her. The commission shall issue a branch office license upon the payment of an annual fee to be established by the commission of not more than fifty dollars per license. The broker or an associate broker shall be the manager of a branch office.

(3) The commission shall provide for verification of the current status of licenses electronically or by other means readily available to the public.

Laws 1973, LB 68, § 19;

Laws 1983, LB 182, § 17;

Laws 1990, LB 350, § 9;

Laws 1991, LB 204, § 3;

Laws 2002, LB 863, § 17;

Laws 2009, LB29, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB23, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB16, § 3.